Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 1. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 25. SERVICE OF A COPY OF THE INDICTMENT

Art. 25.01. IN FELONY. In every case of felony, when the accused is in custody, or as soon as he may be arrested, the clerk of the court where an indictment has been presented shall immediately make a certified copy of the same, and deliver such copy to the sheriff, together with a writ directed to such sheriff, commanding him forthwith to deliver such certified copy to the accused.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 317, ch. 722, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1966.

Art. 25.02. SERVICE AND RETURN. Upon receipt of such writ and copy, the sheriff shall immediately deliver such certified copy of the indictment to the accused and return the writ to the clerk issuing the same, with his return thereon, showing when and how the same was executed.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 317, ch. 722, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1966.

Art. 25.03. IF ON BAIL IN FELONY. When the accused, in case of felony, is on bail at the time the indictment is presented, the clerk shall deliver a copy of the indictment to the accused or the accused's counsel at the earliest possible time.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 317, ch. 722, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1966.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2017.

Art. 25.04. IN MISDEMEANOR. In misdemeanors, the clerk shall deliver a copy of the indictment or information to the accused or the accused's counsel at the earliest possible time before trial.

Acts 1965, 59th Leg., p. 317, ch. 722, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1966.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 950 (S.B. 1849), Sec. 3.04, eff. September 1, 2017.